Hawaii statutes.
PART II.
LICENSING REQUIREMENTS, PROCEDURES AND ENFORCEMENT

Case Notes

Where management company for foreign insurer authorized to do
business in Hawaii did not hold a general agent, subagent, or solicitor license
under this article (1993), it could not have been legally appointed as either a
general agent, subagent, or solicitor of insurer; thus it did not qualify as a
"general agent", "subagent", or "solicitor" as
defined by this chapter (1993), did not fall within the parameters of the
category described by §237-13(7) and was thus subject to a general excise tax
rate of four per cent pursuant to §237-13(6). 115 H. 180, 166 P.3d 353 (2007).

§431:9-201 License required; exception. (a)
No person engaging in the business of insurance in this State shall act as, be
appointed as, or hold oneself out to be an adjuster or independent bill
reviewer unless so licensed by this State.

(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), following
a catastrophe in this State, a Hawaii license shall not be required of a nonresident
adjuster for the adjustment of losses; provided that:

(1) The common losses suffered that are to be
adjusted are a direct result of the catastrophe and shall be so severe that
licensed adjusters and licensed independent adjusters who are residents of this
State will be unable to adjust the losses within a reasonable time as
determined by the commissioner;

(2) The nonresident adjuster provides to the
commissioner a certified copy of the adjuster's current license in another
state. The other state shall have substantially similar licensing requirements
to section 431:9-222; and

(3) Within three working days of the commencement of
work by the nonresident adjuster, the insurance company, independent adjusting
company, or producer that is using the adjuster shall provide on its letterhead
to the commissioner:

(A) The name of the nonresident adjuster;

(B) The nonresident adjuster's Hawaii mailing
and business addresses and phone numbers; and

(C) The nonresident adjuster's permanent home
and business addresses and phone numbers.

Upon satisfaction of all of these requirements,
the nonresident adjuster may be registered with the commissioner and adjust
catastrophic losses in this State for up to one hundred twenty days from the
date of registration or for a period of time determined by the commissioner,
whichever is less.

As used in this subsection,
"catastrophe" means insured property losses in Hawaii that result
from a sudden, specific, and natural or manmade disaster or phenomenon, as
determined by the commissioner.

(c) Any person violating this section shall be
assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each factually different
violation.

(d) Any person who knowingly violates this
section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not less than $1,000 and not more
than $10,000 for each violation.

(e) Each repetition of an act that constitutes
a violation subject to subsection (c) or (d) shall constitute a separate
violation. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1993, c 205, §14; am L 1998, c 203, §1;
am L 2000, c 182, §9 and c 288, §7; am L 2001, c 216, §8; am L 2006, c 154,
§15]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next